Hawaii statutes.
§138-3 Enhanced 911 fund. There is
established outside the state treasury a special fund, to be known as the
enhanced 911 fund, to be administered by the board. The fund shall consist of
amounts collected under section 138-4. The board shall place the funds in an
interest-bearing account at any federally insured financial institution,
separate and apart from the general fund of the State. Moneys in the fund
shall be expended exclusively by the board for the purposes of ensuring
adequate funding to deploy and sustain enhanced 911 service, developing and
funding future enhanced 911 technologies, and funding expenses of administering
the fund. [L 2004, c 159, pt of §2; am L 2009, c 79, §2; am L 2011, c 168, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next